apertium-pl-uk.uk.dix
    <pardef n="робітни/к__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>к</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ка</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кові</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ку</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ка</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ком</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кові</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ку</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ку</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>че</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ків</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кам</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ків</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ками</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ках</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ця</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ці</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ці</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цю</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цею</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ці</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>це</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ці</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ць</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цям</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ць</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цями</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цях</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ці</l>
          <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="робітник"><i>робітни</i><par n="робітни/к__n"/></e>
